Utah statutes.
63I-2-278.   Repeal dates, Title 78A and Title 78B.

(1)  Title 78B, Chapter 3, Part 9, Expedited Jury Trial Act, is repealed January 1, 2017.

(2)  Subsections 78B-5-618(4) and (5) are repealed January 1, 2016.

